Washington statutes.
RCW 11.114.902

Savings—1991 c 193.

To the extent that this chapter, by virtue of RCW 11.114.220(2), does not apply to transfers made in a manner prescribed in the uniform gifts to minors act of Washington or to the powers, duties, and immunities conferred by transfers in that manner upon custodians and persons dealing with custodians, the repeal of the uniform gifts to minors act of Washington does not affect those transfers or those powers, duties, and immunities.

[ 1991 c 193 s 26.]